North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116B. Escheats and Abandoned Property.
Article 1. General.

§ 116B-1.

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-2.1

in new Article 1A of Chapter 116B by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 3.1(b), (d), effective June 26, 2020.

§ 116B-1.1.
Policy and interpretation.

The policy of the State is to recover and transfer property to rightful owners in a manner that is consistent with the interest of the rightful owners. Where the rightful owner cannot be appropriately determined, it is the policy of the State that all benefits realized from any unclaimed or abandoned property shall accrue to the benefit of higher education for the residents of the State. This Chapter shall be liberally interpreted in a manner that fulfills these purposes.

History.

2020-48, s. 3.2.

§ 116B-2.

Recodified as

G.S. 116B-2.2

in new Article 1A of Chapter 116B by Session Laws 2020-48, s. 3.1(c), (d), effective June 26, 2020.